Illinois, session 104th, HB821.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Mobile Home Local Services Tax Act is 5amended by changing Section 14 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 515/14)  (from Ch. 120, par. 1214)7    Sec. 14. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as 8the "Mobile Home Local Services Tax Act".9(Source: P.A. 79-1184.)